New York, session 2025-2026, S2660.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The highway law is amended by adding a new section 344-r to 2 read as follows: 3 § 344-r. Portion of the state highway system to be designated as the 4 "Samuel Trombley Memorial Bridge". The bridge at the intersection of 5 state route eleven and state route one hundred ninety, designated bridge 6 number 1039640 971LX, which crosses over the north branch of the Great 7 Chazy River, in the town of Ellenburg, county of Clinton, shall be 8 designated and known as the "Samuel Trombley Memorial Bridge". 9 § 2. The commissioner of transportation shall provide for the instal- 10 lation and maintenance of adequate signing of the state highway system 11 as designated pursuant to section one of this act. However, to avoid 12 confusion and to limit any possible disruption of commerce, the desig- 13 nation called for pursuant to section one of this act shall be one of 14 ceremonial nature and the official name of such bridge shall not be 15 changed as a result of this act. 16 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD07112-01-5